Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-226
Watercourses, drains, or ditches; failure to clear after notice; penalty.

Any person or individual violating any provisions of sections 31-224 and 31-225, and who shall have been notified by an owner or tenant having the same watercourse, slough, drainage ditch or drainage course running through the land owned or occupied by such person or individual, at least ten days before the filing of a complaint, to remove an obstruction in such watercourse, slough, drainage ditch or drainage course, and who shall fail to comply with such notice, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not more than ten dollars and be liable for all damages caused by reason of such obstruction.

Laws 1911, c. 143, § 3, p. 475;

R.S.1913, § 1796;

C.S.1922, § 1743;

C.S.1929, § 31-326;

R.S.1943, § 31-226.